Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-1793
Line of credit.

(1) Upon application by a member, the credit union may approve a self-replenishing line of credit, either on an unsecured basis or secured by real or personal property, and loan advances may be granted to the member within the limit of such line of credit. When a line of credit has been approved, no additional credit application shall be required as long as the aggregate indebtedness of the line of credit with the credit union does not exceed the approved limit. The credit union may, at its option, require reapplication for a line of credit either periodically or as circumstances warrant.

(2) A line of credit shall be subject to a periodic review by the credit union in accordance with the written policies of the board of directors.

Laws 1996, LB 948, § 93.